src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON enimät_kvant_pl
+Nom:mät K ;
+Gen:miitten K ;
+Ill:mphiin K ;
+Par:mppii K ;
+Par:mppiitä K ;
+Ess:mpinnä    K ;
+Tra:miksi  K ;
+Ine:missä  K ;
+Ela:mistä  K ;
+All:mille  K ;
+Ade:millä  K ;
+Abl:miltä  K ;
+Com:mpinne K ;

LEXICON enniimät_kvant_pl
+Nom:mät K ;
+Gen:miitten K ;
+Ill:mphiin K ;
+Par:mppii K ;
+Par:mppiitä K ;
+Ess:mpinnä    K ;
+Tra:miksi  K ;
+Ine:missä  K ;
+Ela:mistä  K ;
+All:mille  K ;
+Ade:millä  K ;
+Abl:miltä  K ;
+Com:mpinne K ;



LEXICON puolitoista_kvant
+Sg+Nom:itoista K ;
+Sg+Gen:entoista K ;
+Sg+Ill:heentoista K ;
+Sg+Par:tatoista K ;
+Sg+Ess:enatoista    K ;
+Sg+Tra:eksitoista  K ;
+Sg+Ine:essatoista  K ;
+Sg+Ela:estatoista  K ;
+Sg+All:eletoista  K ;
+Sg+Ade:elatoista  K ;
+Sg+Abl:eltatoista  K ;
+Pl+Nom:ettoista K ;
+Pl+Gen:iintoista K ;
+Pl+Gen:tentoista K ;
+Pl+Ill:hiintoista K ;
+Pl+Par:iitoista K ;
+Pl+Ess:inatoista    K ;
+Pl+Tra:iksitoista  K ;
+Pl+Ine:issatoista  K ;
+Pl+Ela:istatoista  K ;
+Pl+All:iletoista  K ;
+Pl+Ade:ilatoista  K ;
+Pl+Abl:iltatoista  K ;
+Pl+Com:inetoista K ;




LEXICON yh_indef
+Sg+Nom:yksi       K ;
+Sg+Gen:yhđen     K ;
!+Sg+Gen:yhen     K ; !đ
+Sg+Ill:yhtheen   K ;
+Sg+Par:yhtä    K ;
+Sg+Ess:yhtenä    K ;
+Sg+Tra:yhđeksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:yhđessä   K ;
+Sg+Ela:yhđestä   K ;
+Sg+All:yhđele    K ;
+Sg+Ade:yhđelä    K ;
+Sg+Abl:yhđeltä   K ;
+Pl+Nom:yhđet       K ;
+Pl+Gen:yksiin     K ;
+Pl+Ill:ykshiin   K ;
+Pl+Par:yksii    K ;
+Pl+Ess:yksinä    K ;
+Pl+Tra:yksiksi   K ;
+Pl+Ine:yksissä   K ;
+Pl+Ela:yksistä   K ;
+Pl+All:yksile    K ;
+Pl+Ade:yksilä    K ;
+Pl+Abl:yksilä   K ;
+Pl+Com:yksine   K ;


LEXICON kaik_kvant
+Sg+Nom:kaikki       K ;
+Sg+Gen:kaiken     K ;
+Sg+Ill:kaikkheen   K ;
+Sg+Par:kaikkee    K ;
+Sg+Ess:kaikkena    K ;
+Sg+Tra:kaikeksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:kaikessa   K ;
+Sg+Ela:kaikesta   K ;
+Sg+All:kaikele    K ;
+Sg+Ade:kaikela    K ;
+Sg+Abl:kaikelta   K ;

+Pl+Nom:kaiket       K ;
+Pl+Gen+Dial/Por:kaikkiin     K ;
+Pl+Gen+Dial/Jok:kaikitten     K ;
+Pl+Gen+Dial/Var:kaikitten     K ;
+Pl+Ill:kaikkhiin   K ;
+Pl+Par+Dial/Por:kaikkii    K ;
+Pl+Par+Dial/Jok:kaikkia    K ;
+Pl+Par+Dial/Var:kaikkia    K ;
+Pl+Ess:kaikkina    K ;
+Pl+Tra:kaikiksi   K ;
+Pl+Ine:kaikissa   K ;
+Pl+Ela:kaikista   K ;
+Pl+All:kaikile    K ;
+Pl+Ade:kaikila    K ;
+Pl+Abl:kaikilta   K ;
+Pl+Com:kaikine    K ;


LEXICON koko_kvant
+Nom:       K ;


LEXICON joka_kvant
+Nom:       K ;


LEXICON jokhai_kvant
+Sg+Nom:nen     K ;
+Sg+Gen:sen     K ;
+Sg+Ill:sheen   K ;
+Sg+Par:sta     K ;
+Sg+Ess:senna   K ;
+Sg+Tra:seksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:sessa   K ;
+Sg+Ela:sesta   K ;
+Sg+All:selle   K ;
+Sg+Ade:sella   K ;
+Sg+Abl:selta   K ;
			    
+Pl+Nom:set      K ;
+Pl+Gen:sten     K ;
+Pl+Ill:shiin    K ;
+Pl+Par:ssii     K ;
+Pl+Par:ssiita   K ;
+Pl+Ess:sinna    K ;
+Pl+Tra:siksi    K ;
+Pl+Ine:sissa    K ;
+Pl+Ela:sista    K ;
+Pl+All:sille    K ;
+Pl+Ade:silla    K ;
+Pl+Abl:silta    K ;


!LEXICON jokai_kvant
!+Nom:nen       K ;
!+Gen:sen    K ;
!+Ill:sheen  K ;
!+Par:sta   K ;
!+Ess:senna    K ;
!+Tra:seksi   K ;
!+Ine:sessa   K ;
!+Ela:sesta   K ;
!+All:selle    K ;
!+Ade:sella    K ;
!+Abl:selta   K ;


LEXICON kummoi_kvant
+Sg+Nom:nen     K ;
+Sg+Gen:sen     K ;
+Sg+Ill:sheen   K ;
+Sg+Par:sta     K ;
+Sg+Ess:senna   K ;
+Sg+Tra:seksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:sessa   K ;
+Sg+Ela:sesta   K ;
+Sg+All:selle   K ;
+Sg+Ade:sella   K ;
+Sg+Abl:selta   K ;
			    
+Pl+Nom:set      K ;
+Pl+Gen:sten     K ;
+Pl+Ill:shiin    K ;
+Pl+Par:ssii     K ;
+Pl+Par:ssiita   K ;
+Pl+Ess:sinna    K ;
+Pl+Tra:siksi    K ;
+Pl+Ine:sissa    K ;
+Pl+Ela:sista    K ;
+Pl+All:sille    K ;
+Pl+Ade:silla    K ;
+Pl+Abl:silta    K ;
+Pl+Com:sinne   K ;


LEXICON kumpai_kvant
+Sg+Nom:nen     K ;
+Sg+Gen:sen     K ;
+Sg+Ill:sheen   K ;
+Sg+Par:sta     K ;
+Sg+Ess:senna   K ;
+Sg+Tra:seksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:sessa   K ;
+Sg+Ela:sesta   K ;
+Sg+All:selle   K ;
+Sg+Ade:sella   K ;
+Sg+Abl:selta   K ;
			    
+Pl+Nom:set      K ;
+Pl+Gen:sten     K ;
+Pl+Ill:shiin    K ;
+Pl+Par:ssii     K ;
+Pl+Par:ssiita   K ;
+Pl+Ess:sinna    K ;
+Pl+Tra:siksi    K ;
+Pl+Ine:sissa    K ;
+Pl+Ela:sista    K ;
+Pl+All:sille    K ;
+Pl+Ade:silla    K ;
+Pl+Abl:silta    K ;
+Pl+Com:sinne   K ;

LEXICON minkalai_kvant 
+Nom:nen       K ;
+Gen:sen    K ;
+Ill:sheen  K ;
+Par:sta   K ;
+Ess:sena    K ;
+Tra:seksi   K ;
+Ine:sessa   K ;
+Ela:sesta   K ;
+All:sele    K ;
+Ade:sela    K ;
+Abl:selta   K ;

!LEXICON jokainu_kvant
! +Nom:       # ;

LEXICON ainut_kvant
 +Nom:a       K ;
 +Gen:an     K ;
 +Ill:haan    K ;
 +Par:aa     K ;
 +Ess:ana    K ;
 +Tra:aksi   K ;
 +Ine:assa   K ;
 +Ela:asta   K ;
 +All:ale    K ;
 +Ade:ala    K ;
 +Abl:alta   K ;

LEXICON plainut_kvant
 +Nom:at      K ;
 +Gen:oin     K ;
 +Ill:hoin    K ;
 +Par:oi      K ;
 +Ess:aina    K ;
 +Tra:aiksi   K ;
 +Ine:oissa   K ;
 +Ela:oista   K ;
 +All:oile    K ;
 +Ade:oila    K ;
 +Abl:oilta   K ;

LEXICON itte_kvant
+Attr:e     K ;
+Nom:e      K ;
+Gen:en     K ;
+Ill:heen   K ;
+Par:ee     K ;
+Par:eä     K ;
+Par:iä     K ;
+Ess:enä    K ;
+Tra:eksi   K ;
+Ine:essä   K ;
+Ela:estä   K ;
+All:ele    K ;
+Ade:elä    K ;
+Abl:eltä   K ;

LEXICON kukin_kvant
+Nom:ki         K ;
+Nom:kin        K ;
+Gen:nki        K ;
+Ill:hnki       K ;
+Par:taki       K ;
+Ess:naki       K ;
+Tra:ksiki      K ;
+Ine:ssaki      K ;
+Ela:staki      K ;
+All:lleki      K ;
+Ade:llaki      K ;
+Abl:ltaki      K ;


LEXICON kekin_kvant ! ed. rinnakkaismuotoja
+Gen:nenki    K ;
+Ill:henki  K ;
+Par:taki   K ;
+Ess:näki    K ;
+Tra:ksiki   K ;
+Ine:ssäki   K ;
+Ela:stäki   K ;
+All:lleki    K ;
+Ade:lläki    K ;
+Abl:ltäki   K ;


LEXICON sgkum_kvant
+Nom:piki K ;
+Gen:manki K ;
+Ill:phaanki K ;
+Par:ppaaki K ;
+Par:paaki K ;
+Ess:panaki    K ;
+Tra:maksiki   K ;
+Ine:massaki    K ;
+Ela:mastaki    K ;
+All:malleki    K ;
+Ade:mallaki    K ;
+Abl:maltaki    K ;


LEXICON plkum_kvant
+Nom:matki K ;
+Gen:ppinki K ;
+Gen:mittenki K ;
+Ill:phiinki K ;
+Par:ppiiki K ;
+Par:piaki K ;
+Ess:pinaki    K ;
+Tra:miksiki   K ;
+Ine:missaki    K ;
+Ela:mistaki    K ;
+All:mileki   K ;
+Ade:milaki   K ;
+Abl:miltaki   K ;


LEXICON molem_kvant
!+Sg+Nom:pi     K ;
!+Sg+Gen:an     K ;
!+Sg+Ill:phaan   K ;
!+Sg+Par:ppaa     K ;
!+Sg+Ess:panna   K ;
!+Sg+Tra:aksi   K ;
!+Sg+Ine:assa   K ;
!+Sg+Ela:asta   K ;
!+Sg+All:alle   K ;
!+Sg+Ade:alla   K ;
!+Sg+Abl:alta   K ;
			    
+Pl+Nom:at      K ;
+Pl+Gen:iitten     K ;
+Pl+Ill:phiin    K ;
+Pl+Par:ppii     K ;
+Pl+Par:ppiita   K ;
+Pl+Ess:pinna    K ;
+Pl+Tra:iksi    K ;
+Pl+Ine:issa    K ;
+Pl+Ela:ista    K ;
+Pl+All:ille    K ;
+Pl+Ade:illa    K ;
+Pl+Abl:ilta    K ;
+Pl+Com:pinne K ;

LEXICON moni_kvant
+Sg+Nom:i K ;
+Sg+Par:ta K ;
+Sg+Gen:en K ;
+Sg+Ill:heen   K ;
+Sg+Ess:ena    K ;
+Sg+Tra:eksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:essa   K ;
+Sg+Ela:esta   K ;
+Sg+All:ele   K ;
+Sg+Ade:ela    K ;
+Sg+Abl:elta   K ;
+Pl+Nom:et K ;
+Pl+Par:nii K ;
+Pl+Gen:niin K ;
+Pl+Ill:hiin   K ;
+Pl+Ess:ina    K ;
+Pl+Tra:iksi   K ;
+Pl+Ine:issa   K ;
+Pl+Ela:ista   K ;
+Pl+All:ile   K ;
+Pl+Ade:ila    K ;
+Pl+Abl:ilta   K ;
