src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronoun
yksi+Pron+Indef+Sg:                        yh_indef ;
kaikki+Pron+Qu:                     kaik_kvant ;
koko+Pron+Qu:koko                       koko_kvant ;
joka+Pron+Qu:joka                       joka_kvant ;
jokhainen+Pron+Qu:jokhai                jokhai_kvant ;
kummoinen+Pron+Qu:kummoi             kummoi_kvant ; 
kumpainen+Pron+Qu+:kumpai            kumpai_kvant ;
minkälainen+Pron+Qu:minkälai         minkalai_kvant ; 
ainua+Pron+Qu:ainu                      ainut_kvant ;
itte+Pron+Qu:itt                        itte_kvant ;
kukin+Pron+Qu:ku                        kukin_kvant ;
kekin+Pron+Qu:ke                        kekin_kvant ;
kumpiki+Pron+Qu+Sg:kum                  sgkum_kvant ;
kummatki+Pron+Qu+Pl:kum                 plkum_kvant ;
molemat+Pron+Qu:molem                   molem_kvant ;
moni+Pron+Qu:mon                        moni_kvant ;
puolitoista+Pron+Qu:puol           puolitoista_kvant ;
harva+Pron+Qu+Sg:harv                 ainut_kvant ;
harva+Pron+Qu+Pl:harv                 plainut_kvant ;
enniimät+Pron+Qu+Pl:ennii            enniimät_kvant_pl ; !!! TODO en osaa enempää/MK
enimät+Pron+Qu+Pl:eni            enimät_kvant_pl ; !!! TODO en osaa enempää/MK
